District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-809

Surrender of license; loss or destruction of license.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 10, 44 DCR 140
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 20, 50 DCR 260
1981 Ed., § 35-1329.